Hawaii statutes.
[§286-306] Expiration; renewal;
replacement. (a) Every identification card issued under this part,
whether an original or a renewal, shall bear an expiration date that shall be
the date and month of the individual's birthday eight years after the year of
issuance; provided that if the individual is a legal nonimmigrant,
the certificate shall bear an expiration date that is the same as the
expiration date on the individual's arrival-departure record, CBP Form I-94. A
cardholder may renew the cardholder's identification card within six months
before the day on which it expires by filing an application in accordance with
section 286-303 and paying the prescribed fee [established] by rules of the
director.

(b) If an identification card is lost,
destroyed, stolen, or mutilated, the individual to whom the identification card
was issued may obtain a duplicate by paying the fee established by rules of the
director and by:

(1) Furnishing suitable proof of the loss,
destruction, or mutilation to the examiner; and

(2) Filing an application and presenting documentary
evidence under section 286-303.

Any individual who loses an identification card and,
after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original, shall immediately surrender
the original to the examiner.

(c) The examiner of drivers shall cancel any
identification card upon determining that the identification card was obtained
unlawfully, issued in error, or altered. The examiner also shall cancel a REAL
ID compliant identification card that is surrendered to the examiner of drivers
after the cardholder has obtained a duplicate or replacement REAL ID compliant
identification card, or if a REAL ID-compliant driver's license has been
previously issued.

(d) No agent of the State or its political
subdivisions shall condition the granting of any benefit, service, right, or
privilege upon the possession by any individual of an identification card.
Nothing in this section shall preclude any publicly operated or franchised
transit system from using an identification card for the purpose of granting benefits or services of the system. No individual shall be required to apply for,
carry, or possess an identification card. [L 2012, c 310, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next